Nevada, session 83, SB408.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 450.180 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.180 The board of hospital trustees or any hospital
governing board appointed pursuant to NRS 450.175 may:
1. Appoint a chief executive officer and necessary assistants,
and fix their compensations.
2. Employ physicians, [interns and dentists,] surgeons and
dentists, including, without limitation, medical and dental
residents and fellows, either full-time or part-time, as the board
determines necessary, and fix their compensations.
3. Remove those appointees and employees.
4. Control the admission of physicians , surgeons and dentists,
including, without limitation, medical and dental residents and
[interns] fellows, to the staff by promulgating appropriate rules,
regulations and standards governing those appointments.
5. Contract with individual physicians or private medical
associations for the provision of certain medical services as may be
required by the hospital.
Sec. 2. NRS 450.455 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.455 A board of hospital trustees may institute and maintain
training programs in the county hospital for resident physicians,
[including interns] fellows and postgraduates. Such programs must
meet the standards for recognition by the American Medical
Association , or its successor organization, and for accreditation by
the [Liaison Committee on] Accreditation Council for Graduate
Medical Education [.] , or its successor organization.
Sec. 3. NRS 450.640 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.640 The board of trustees may:
1. After the board is formed pursuant to the provisions of NRS
450.620 or 450.625, increase the number of members who serve on
the board by appointing, as a voting member of the board, one
physician who is the chief of staff of physicians for a district
hospital. The term of office of a member who is appointed pursuant
to this subsection is 2 years, commencing on the date of
appointment by the board of trustees. A vacancy in the term of a
member appointed pursuant to this subsection must be filled in the
same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
2. Appoint a chief executive officer and necessary assistants
for each hospital, and fix the compensations of such persons.
3. Employ physicians, surgeons and dentists, including,
without limitation, medical and dental residents and [interns,]
fellows, as the board determines necessary, and fix their
compensation.
4. Remove such appointees and employees.
5. Remove persons who are appointed or employed pursuant to
this section.
6. Control the admission of physicians, surgeons and dentists,
including, without limitation, medical and dental residents and
[interns] fellows, to the staff by promulgating rules, regulations and
standards governing such appointments.
Sec. 4. NRS 450.800 is hereby amended to read as follows:
450.800 1. In addition to having the powers conferred under
chapter 277 of NRS, a county or district hospital may contract with
a private hospital or other organization for emergency medical
services, including the transportation of patients, or any other
services performed in connection with or related to the operation of
a hospital. The services may be performed by the parties to the
contract or the parties may establish a separate organization for that
purpose.
2. A county or district hospital may enter into a contract to
provide [services:] or form a separate organization to provide or
enter into a contract to provide:
(a) [For] Crisis stabilization services or any other mental or
behavioral health services performed in connection with a facility
that has received or is seeking an endorsement as a crisis
stabilization center pursuant to NRS 449.0915.
(b) Other services for persons, whether or not admitted to the
hospital, if those services are performed in connection with or
related to the operation of the hospital.
[(b) Necessary]
(c) Other services necessary for the health and welfare of the
general public.
3. As used in this section, “crisis stabilization services” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0915.
Sec. 5. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)